Utah statutes.
31A-22-521.   Notice of right to convert under group policy.
Certificates of insurance evidencing coverage under a group life insurance
policy shall prominently notify individuals of conversion rights and contain
information concerning the time and manner in which conversion to an
individual life insurance policy may be made.
